Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3410
Vicarious liability; exempt.

A program and an owner shall be exempt from vicarious liability in accordance with 49 U.S.C. 30106(a), as such section existed on January 1, 2023, and under any state or local law that imposes liability solely based on vehicle ownership.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 10.